Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Creation and Organization of Commission.

Collateral references. —

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Civil Rights, § 1 et seq.

14 C.J.S., Civil Rights, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 18.80.010.
Creation.

There is created in the office of the governor a State Commission for Human Rights.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963)

Sec. 18.80.020.
Composition and appointment.

The commission consists of seven commissioners, appointed by the governor for staggered terms of five years, and confirmed by the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 1972)

Sec. 18.80.030.
Chairman of commission.

The commission shall elect one of its members as chairman.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963)

Sec. 18.80.040.
Commission meetings.

The commission shall hold a regular annual meeting and shall hold special meetings as necessitated by AS

18.80.120

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963)

Sec. 18.80.050.
Regulations.

The commission shall adopt procedural and substantive regulations necessary to implement this chapter.

The commission shall adopt regulations relating to discrimination because of physical and mental disability. The regulations must furnish guidance concerning the circumstances under which it is necessary to make a reasonable accommodation for a physically or mentally disabled person when providing employment, financing or credit, public accommodations, the sale or rental of real property, or other goods, services, facilities, advantages, or privileges under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963; am § 5 ch 69 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For inquiries, see 6 AAC 30, art. 1.

For complaints, see 6 AAC 30, art. 2.

For investigation, determination, and conciliation, see 6 AAC 30, art. 3.

For hearing procedures, see 6 AAC 30, art. 4.

For hearing discovery, see 6 AAC 30, art. 5.

For reports and recordkeeping, see 6?AAC 30, art. 8.

Sec. 18.80.060.
Powers and duties of the commission.

In addition to the other powers and duties prescribed by this chapter, the commission shall

appoint an executive director approved by the governor;

hire other administrative staff as may be necessary to the commission’s function;

exercise general supervision and direct the activities of the executive director and other administrative staff;

accept complaints under AS

18.80.100

;

study the problems of discrimination in all or specific fields of human relationships, foster through community effort or goodwill, cooperation and conciliation among the groups and elements of the population of the state, and publish results of investigations and research as in its judgment will tend to eliminate discrimination because of race, religion, color, national ancestry, physical or mental disability, age, sex, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, or parenthood;

make an overall assessment, at least once every three years, of the progress made toward equal employment opportunity by every department of state government; results of the assessment shall be included in the annual report made under AS

18.80.150

.

In addition to other powers and duties prescribed by this chapter, the commission may

delegate to the executive director all powers and duties given it by this chapter except the duties and powers given it by AS

18.80.120

and

18.80.130

;

call upon the departments and agencies of the state, with the approval of the governor, for cooperation and assistance in carrying out this chapter;

hold hearings under AS

18.80.120

;

establish the amount and manner of payment of fees for educational services, information, and materials that the commission provides to public and private organizations and other persons.

A commissioner or an employee authorized by the commission may administer oaths, certify to all official acts, and issue subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, and other process to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of testimony, records, papers, accounts, and documents in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding before the commission in the state. The commission, a commissioner, or an employee authorized by the commission may petition a court of this state to enforce its subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, and other process.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 117 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 1969; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 104 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 75 SLA 1978; am § 49 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 6 ch 69 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For inquiries, see 6 AAC 30, art. 1.

For complaints, see 6 AAC 30, art. 2.

For investigation, determination, and conciliation, see 6 AAC 30, art. 3.

For hearing procedures, see 6 AAC 30, art. 4.

For hearing discovery, see 6 AAC 30, art. 5.

For reports and recordkeeping, see 6?AAC 30, art. 8.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The commission’s responsibilities may be viewed as twofold: (1) to study and report on the problems of discrimination, and (2) to take affirmative steps to eliminate any discrimination discovered.
May 14, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

AS

18.80.220(b)

should be interpreted to require the commission to keep confidential information from a survey for records maintained to administer civil rights laws and regulations until it is presented at public hearing unless the information is released in a format which does not identify individual responding employers or unions.
May 14, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.80.070.
Compensation.

The members of the commission are authorized per diem and travel allowances allowable to members of other boards and commissions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1963)

Cross references. —

For transportation and per diem expenses for members of boards and commissions, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 18.80.075.
Legal counsel.

The attorney general is the legal counsel for the commission. The attorney general shall advise the commission in legal matters arising in the discharge of its duties, shall assist in the preparation and presentation of complaints to the commission, and shall represent the commission in legal actions to which it is a party.

The commission may employ temporary legal counsel for proceedings before the commission and court actions involving the commission in which proceedings or actions the attorney general is representing another agency of the state government.

History.

(§ 2 ch 42 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For investigation, determination, and conciliation, see 6 AAC 30, art. 3.